Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3546
Professional geologist; licensure; application; eligibility, years of practice in another jurisdiction.

(1) An individual may apply to the board to be licensed as a professional geologist if such individual:

(a) Has been licensed to practice geology for at least fifteen years in one or more jurisdictions; and

(b) Practiced geology in any such jurisdiction in compliance with the licensing laws of such jurisdiction.

(2) The following are required for an applicant to be eligible for licensure by the board as a professional geologist under this section:

(a) The applicant has passed an examination on the statutes, rules, regulations, and other requirements unique to Nebraska;

(b) The applicant submitted an application accompanied by the fee established by the board;

(c) The applicant submitted documentation of fifteen or more years of licensed geologic practice in another jurisdiction; and

(d) The applicant submitted one or more acceptable written references.

Laws 2025, LB38, § 36.